Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-807
Regional Radiation Health Center; public power district; payments to center; benefits; requirements.

Upon the payment of eighty thousand dollars to the University of Nebraska Medical Center for the development of the Regional Radiation Health Center described in sections 85-805 and 85-806, a public power district owning a nuclear electric generating plant in Nebraska shall have the right to refer patients to the Regional Radiation Health Center and obtain services at cost, and no public power district shall operate a nuclear electric generating plant in Nebraska without obtaining such right.

Laws 1972, LB 1405, § 4.